District of Columbia statutes.
47-2422

Civil penalties and administrative sanctions.

(a)

The Mayor may revoke, suspend, or deny under § 47-2405 the general sales license endorsement on the master business license of any cigarette or other tobacco product dealer for a violation of this chapter or any implementing rule promulgated by the Mayor as provided under § 47-2415.

(a-1)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of § 47-2404, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of that section, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of § 47-2404, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of that section, shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

(b)

The Mayor may (1) impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed the greater of 500% of the retail value of the cigarettes or other tobacco product involved or $5,000 for a violation of this chapter, or (2) assess tax due and interest on any product acquired, possessed, sold, or offered for sale in violation of this chapter.

(c)

The license or authorization to affix stamps of an agent, distributor, dealer, or person found liable for a civil penalty under subsection (b)(1) of this section on 2 or more occasions shall be revoked and the agent, distributor, dealer, or person shall not be eligible for a license or authorized by the District to affix tax stamps under this chapter for one year.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-225, § 2(c), 48 DCR 35
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 16(c)(3), 48 DCR 1873
July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-189, § 4(d), 57 DCR 3019
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7012(e)(9), 61 DCR 9990
D.C. Law 13-313 inserted the section symbol in the section heading.
D.C. Law 18-189 added subsec. (a-1); and, in subsec. (b), substituted “cigarettes or other tobacco product” for “cigarettes”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added “or other tobacco product” in (a).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7022(e)(9) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7012(e)(9) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7012(e)(9) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).